Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1421HZ (1) 91 da/jh H.F. 997 Section 1. Section 490.122, subsection 1, paragraph ad, 1 Code 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph. 2 Sec. 2. Section 490.122, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 3 following new subsection: 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. The secretary of state may impose, 5 assess, and collect a filing fee as a condition to accepting a 6 biennial report as provided in section 490.1621. 7 Sec. 3. Section 490.1621, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 8 amended to read as follows: 9 4. The first biennial report shall must be delivered to 10 the secretary of state between January 1 and April 1 of the 11 first even-numbered year following the calendar year in which a 12 domestic corporation was incorporated or a foreign corporation 13 was registered to do business in this state. Subsequent A 14 biennial reports report must be delivered to the secretary 15 of state between January 1 and April 1 of the each following 16 even-numbered calendar years year . For purposes of this 17 section , each A filing fee for the biennial report shall be 18 determined by the secretary of state pursuant to section 19 490.122. The biennial report shall contain information related 20 to the two-year period immediately preceding the calendar year 21 in which the report is filed. 22